["  spoken:  Oh yeah, this is Eminem baby, back up in that motherfucking ass One time for your mother fucking mind, we represent the 313 You know what I'm saying?, 'cause they don't know shit about this For the 9-6  Ayo, my pen and paper cause a chain reaction To get your brain relaxin, 'cause they be actin' maniac in action A brainiac in fact son, you mainly lack attraction You looking zany whack with just a fraction of my tracks spun My rhyming skills got you climbing hills I travel through your mind into your spine like siren drills I'm sliming grills of roaches, with sprayed on disinfectants Twistin necks of rappers till their spinal column disconnects Put this in decks and check the monologue, turn your system up Twist them up, and indulge in the marijuana smog This is the season for noise pollution contamination Examination of more cartoons than animation My lamination of narration Hit's a snare and bass in the track fucked up rapper interrogation When I declare invasion, there ain't no time to be staring, gazing I turn the stage into a barren wasteland... I'm Infinite  You heard of hell well I was sent from it I went to it serving a sentence for murdering instruments Now I'm trying to repent from it But when I hear the beat I'm tempted to make another attempt at it... I'm Infinite  Bust it, I let the beat commence so I can beat the sense in your elite defense I got some meat to mince, a crew to stomp and then two feet to rinse I greet the gents and ladies, I spoil all your fans I foil plans and leave fluids leaking like oil pans My coiled hands around this microphone are lethal One thought in my cerebral is deeper then a Jeep full of people MC's are feeble, I came to cause some pandemonium Battle a band of phony MC's and stand the lonely one Imitator, Intimidator, Stimulator, Simulator of data, Eliminator There's never been a greater since the burial of Jesus Fuck around and catch all of the venereal diseases My thesis will smash a stereo to pieces My accapella releases plastic masterpieces through telekinesis That eases you mentally, gently, sentimentally, instrumentally With entity, dementedly meant to be Infinite  You heard of hell well I was sent from it I went to it serving a sentence for murdering instruments Now I'm trying to repent from it But when I hear the beat I'm tempted to make another attempt at it... I'm Infinite  Man I got evidence I'm never dense and I been clever ever since My residence was hesitant to do some shit that represents the M-O So I'm assuming all responsibility Cause there's a monster will in me that always wants to kill MC's Mic messaler, slamming like a wrestler Here to make a mess of a lyric smuggling embezzler No one is speacialer, My skill is intergalactical I get cynical act a fool then I send a crew back to school I never packed a tool or acted cool, it wasn't practical I'd rather let a tactical, tactful, track tickle your fancy In fact I can't see, or can't imagine A man who ain't a lover of beats or a fan of scratching This is for my family, the kid who had a cameo on my last jam Plus the man who never had a plan B Be all you can be, cause once you make an instant hit I'm tensed a bit and tempted when I see the sins my friends commit... I'm Infinite  You heard of hell well I was sent from it I went to it serving a sentence for murdering instruments Now I'm trying to repent from it But when I hear the beat I'm tempted to make another attempt at it... I'm Infinite You heard of hell well I was sent from it I went to it serving a sentence for murdering instruments Now I'm trying to repent from it But when I hear the beat I'm tempted to make another attempt at it... I'm Infinite  \n ", '  Proof  Here is Soul Intent checkin\' in at number 1 baby this week, You know what I\'m sayin\'? This is MC Proof   DJ Head  And DJ Heeaad!   Proof  Checkin\' in on W.E.G.O. You know what I\'m sayin\'? Ayo we got the number one requested song, Of the day, coming up next It\'s a local 313 talent He goes by the name of Eminem And it\'s called " It\'s OK " Check it out  \n ', " Eye-Kyu: Check it out,  Eminem: Hey Kyu!  Eye-Kyu: Chorus: It's a broke day but everything is ok (It's ok) I'm up all night, but everything is all right (It's all right) It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep (I can't sleep) It's a long year pretending I belong here (Belong here) It's a broke day but everything is ok (It's ok) I'm up all night, but everything is all right (It's all right) It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep (I can't sleep) It's a long year pretending I belong here (Belong here)  Verse 1: Eminem One day I plan to be a family man happily married I wanna grow to be so old that I have to be carried Till I'm glad to be buried And leave this crazy world And have at least a half a million for my baby girl It may be early to be planning this stuff 'Cause I'm still struggling hard to be the man, and it's tough Cause man it's been rough, but still I manage enough I've been taken advantage of, damaged and scuffed My hands have been cuffed But I don't panic and huff, frantic and puff Or plan to give up, the minute shit hits the fan it erupts I'm anteing up double or nothing, I've been trouble enough And I'm sick of struggling and suffering, see My destiny's to rest at ease, till I'm impressed and pleased With my progress, I won't settle for less than cheese I'm on a quest to seize all, my own label to call Way before my baby is able to crawl I'm too stable to fall, the pressure motivates To know I hold the weight of boulders on my shoulder blades I seen the golden gates to heaven on Earth Where they don't pull a weapon on you when you stepping on turf, Q  Eye-Kyu: Chorus: It's a broke day but everything is ok (It's ok) I'm up all night, but everything is all right (It's all right) It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep (I can't sleep) It's a long year pretending I belong here (Belong here) It's a broke day but everything is ok (It's ok) I'm up all night, but everything is all right (It's all right) It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep (I can't sleep) It's a long year pretending I belong here (Belong here)  Verse 2: Eminem I'm going for broke, gambling and playing for keeps Everyday in the streets, scrambling and paying for cheap Praying for sleep Dreaming with a watering mouth Wishing for a better life for my daughter and spouse In this slaughtering house, caught up in bouts With the root of all evil I've seen it turn beautiful people crude and deceitful And make them do shit illegal For these Grant's and Jackson's These transactions explain a man's actions But in the mist of this insanity, I found my Christianity Through God and there's a wish he granted me He showed me how to cope with the stress And hope for the best, instead of mope and depressed Always groping a mess, of flying over the nest To selling dope with the rest I quit smoking cess to open my chest Life is stressful inside this cesspool Trying to wrestle, I almost bust a blood vessel My little brother's trying to learn his mathematics He's asthmatic, running home from school away from crack addicts Kids attract static, children with automatics Taking target practice on teens for Starter Jackets I'm using smarter tactics to overcome this slum I won't become as dumb as some and succumb to scum It's cumbersome, I'm trying to do well on this Earth But it's been Hell on this Earth since I fell on this Earth  Eye-Kyu: Chorus: It's a broke day but everything is ok (It's ok) I'm up all night, but everything is all right (It's all right) It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep (I can't sleep) It's a long year pretending I belong here (Belong here) It's a broke day but everything is ok (It's ok) I'm up all night, but everything is all right (It's all right) It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep (I can't sleep) It's a long year pretending I belong here (Belong here)  Uh, it's ok, yeah it's all right, even though I can't sleep Uh yeah, it's ok, it's all right, I can't sleep  \n ", " Eye-Kyu: Now what you know about a sweet MC, from the 313 None of these skills you bout to see come free So you wanna be a sweet MC, you gotta become me If you ever wanna be one see  Eminem: Man what you know about a sweet MC, in the 313 None of these skills you bout to see come free So you wanna be a sweet MC, you better become me If you ever wanna be one see  Verse 1: Eye-Kyu Yo some people say I'm whack, now if that's right I'm the freshest whack MC that you ever heard, in your lifetime My slick accapella sounds clever with the beats Boy I'm the deepest thing since potholes to ever hit the streets Forgot a gold digger's succubus, my souls thick with ruggedness With the mic I'm like a dyke, can't no nigga fuck with this I got more Different Strokes than Philip Drummound On open mic I bone your women just to keep my lyrics coming (bitch) We elevated to new heights premeditated Let it be that I stated they hate it now that they see that I made it The escalated can be put to the test of greatness Snatch the heart from MC's and I ate it So I take it that's the reason I'm hated To represent my temperament If rap was a dick all you so called hard MC's would not be impitant But pimping it, and acting like you could rock a show (so) Harder than LL's Rock the Bells, but you is a ho (now) Everything that you collaborate I lacerate My rhymes they keep coming like nympho maniacs that masturbate At a faster rate, yeah I got something for your ass to hate I blasterate, and have you all running master gates And as for face clutching and touching the flows I got them open like marijuana smoke up in your nose Bucking these hoes, I got that shit down to a science Leaving them hot and bothered, turned on like an appliance Defiance, no we won't have that You want your shit to blow up? Well I'ma stuff some dynamite in your ass crack And blast that shit to kingdom come Then bring them some of this real hip-hop I drop beats and you ain't singing or gonna do a thing about And you all knew from Meeko That you couldn't hold your own with the strength of Lou Forigno So stop that bullshit and flow Yo, you need to come with the real skills, and act like you know  Chorus: Eminem So what you know about a sweet MC, in the 313 None of these skills you bout to see come free So you wanna be a sweet MC, you better become me If you ever wanna be one see  Eye-Kyu: Now what you know about a sweet MC, from the 313 None of these skills you bout to see come free So you wanna be the sweet MC, you gotta become me If you ever wanna be one see  Verse 2: Eminem So what, you know about a sweet MC, in the 313 You don't know shit so when you see one flee You can be Run-D, you'll never beat the MC I'll stop the alphabet at S and got it down to a T I'm sure your bound to agree, a sweet MC crashes the spot I'll make the roof hot like I was Rock Master Scott Your ass forgot, so just in case you don't remember me I'll run your brain around the block to jog your fucking memory It's either them or me man, kill or be killed You will and be sealed your casket closed you still gonna be billed My facilities filled with fans, packed to capacity I'll send a rapper back with the crack of his ass shitty If he's acting soft and he cowers He better come cleaner then Jay Rue jacking off when he showers You flowers got no clout with a thing You could date a stick of dynamite and wouldn't go out with a bang I showered the slang, simple as A, B, C's Skip over the D's and rock the microphone with E's Dethrone MC's and I'ma max alone Relax your dome like a solo from a saxophone So facts are known, writers get treated with shocks I rock a beat harder then you could beat it with rocks I'm greeted with flocks, of fellow follower's singers You couldn't make the fans throw up their hands if they swallowed their Fingers But you can bring yours let's see what you got But don't front and never try to be what you're not Cause you can be quick, jump the candlestick, burn your back And fuck Jill on a hill, but you still ain't Jack  Chorus: Eye-Kyu So what you know about a sweet MC, from the 313 None of these skills you just seen come free So you wanna be a sweet MC, you'll never become me So you ain't ever gonna be one see Eminem: So what you know about a sweet MC, in the 313 None of these skills that you just seen come free So you wanna be a sweet MC, you'll never become me So you ain't ever gonna be one see  \n ", " Women Singing: Ah, Ah, Ah, Ah, Ah  I'm getting mad love, I'm snuggling hugs Druggling thugs, smuggling drugs, juggling jobs, guzzling jugs So here's a toast to federal checks Hetero sex, unaffordable medical debts, huh We travel in packs and ravel in facts and gravel in cracks To find babbling Max, gaffling tracks I grapple an axe for them baffling acts The mysterious stab in the backs who dabble in wax Still in my yard when I sculpted the culprit The tall shit that will end up with his skull split Then I buried the hatchet, I carried the fat chick Butterfingers is here and it's necessary to scratch it Baby all I wanna do is swallow one and two Smoke a little bit and follow one of you Back home when the party ends So tonight I'm dropping naughty hints To the finest women in the audience  Women Singing: They honor the Ah, Ah, Ah, Ah (blends in with lyrics)  Eminem: 'Cause we came here to do this tonight We don't wanna fight, we don't want no one feeling uptight 'Cause we came here to do this tonight Till the morning light hope that everyone's feeling all right 'Cause we came here to do this tonight We don't wanna fight, we don't want no one feeling uptight 'Cause we came here to do this tonight Till the morning light hope that everyone's feeling all right  Ayo, spiders are like tarantulas, vandealous Living as scandalous as a television evangelist But I can handle this, I'm the rhyme biter crime fighter Caped crusader, taking care of undeserving lime lighters I think a living never meant for me Experimentally I found a way to spread interamentally When I stumbled upon this resolution By using a special fusion of chemical solution for this resolution You couldn't see me with binoculars I armed like an octopus Step on stage and you get socked and pushed Talking that junk like you went black, guarded your back Come battle me and you get smacked as hard as you act When I rap I represent it and will never referee in it Every minute so when I win it you never resent it I'm forever demented, come up with funk, I'll never be scented You got the point when I cleverly said it  Women Singing: Ah, Ah, Ah, Ah (blends in with lyrics)  Eminem: 'Cause we came here to do this tonight We don't wanna fight, we don't want no one feeling uptight 'Cause we came here to do this tonight Till the morning light hope that everyone's feeling all right 'Cause we came here to do this tonight We don't wanna fight, we don't want no one feeling uptight 'Cause we came here to do this tonight Till the morning light hope that everyone's feeling all right  Eminem is heading skyward For those who thought that I would make you bored And treat you like a piece Of plywood I've got miracle lyrical capability all in me With the agility to escape a killer bee colony So get your cameras and capture how miraculous I rap for all you Draculas and showed you all how whack you was I meant it as a dis, cause you don't posses the pizzazz as this I'm hazardous enough already as it is Without you adding fuel to the fire I'm cruel to the liar Who fails to recognize my reign of hell, rule to the sire Clinical studies show that I'm cynical There's no one who's identical to my fresh and authentic flow I'm sure the party people can agree That I'm enchanting, with the romantic Freaking the vocals so frantically So throw your hands up in the atmosphere And let them know the only party that was phat was here, just be like  Women Singing: Ah, Ah, Ah, Ah, Ah (blends in with lyrics)  Eminem: 'Cause we came here to do this tonight We don't wanna fight, we don't want no one feeling uptight 'Cause we came here to do this tonight Till the morning light hope that everyone's feeling all right 'Cause we came here to do this tonight We don't wanna fight, we don't want no one feeling uptight 'Cause we came here to do this tonight Till the morning light hope that everyone's feeling all right  \n ", ' Maxine! (Phone Rings)  Maxine: Hello Denaun: Can I speak to Maxine? Maxine: Yeah this is me what\'s up? Denaun: What up? Maxine: Who dis? Denaun: Denaun Maxine: Yeah what\'s up? Denaun: What are you doing? Maxine: Nothing, just laying in bed Denaun: Huh? Maxine: Nothing, just laying in bed Denaun: Why? Maxine: I don\'t know, thinking about something freaky to do  Verse 1: Eminem I know this crack fiend Maxine who needs a vaccine She tests positive but tells you that her act\'s clean Plus she got a sugar daddy Asking every hooker that he takes in to crook her badly If you mistook her sadly, on her reputation You\'re in jepordation, if you ain\'t got no preparation When you step away son, she got her face done Looking provocative, she\'ll let you knock it if You press the issue and get undressed to kiss you If you match the price, otherwise she won\'t look at you twice But when you catch the lice, or get the urgency To go to the emergency cause it burns to pee Don\'t bring your germs to me, \'cause I ain\'t trying to hear it While your fighting you fucking disease trying to clear it (Maxine!)  Verse 2: Denaun Porter Sometimes I wonder, what\'s your purpose? In life that is To get with every brother and unveil one of his kids, shit You living trife, got three kids at home and club hopping every night You say it\'s gonna stop but it... just... slows... down And then speeds back to a regular pace, there is no end to this Mystery, whatever your reason even is to be You say you wanna be with me, but how can you say that When you got niggas hiding in your closet I refrain from getting angry but you keep on that strangely  I met this girl last week, she was a freak, and she liked me So I stepped on it and then asked my homies And chilled on the side and then watched they niggas Big game over there and take notes, while I get this number I stepped to her first I cleared my throat and said "Hey Bitch... Haven\'t I seen you before?", looked at my nigga Turned around and got slapped throughout my hands And said "Oh it\'s like that?" She said she just broke up with her nigga and shit She started crying, and asked me to forgive her and shit She said her name was Maxine, so I told her I wanted her number She asked could I give her mine two Got to the crib and called her up We got into a good conversation that\'s when she asked me could I fuck I said "Maxine check this out, Give me your address I\'ll be through and you\'ll find out" Got to the crib she let me in She didn\'t waste time she grabbed my hand and proceeded to the bedroom I said "Hold up, and stop proceeding, you rushing things" What the fuck are you doing? So I went for my protection, took off my clothes and started flexing As she went for my midsection I threw her down as I tore off her shirt Pulled out my jimmy and I thought about putting in work Before I hit it she said "3 don\'t get mad but there\'s something that I gotta tell your ass" I said "What is it, another nigga? It\'s ok" She said "No I forgot to tell you, that I got AIDS" I got up out  Denaun: Hey, Maxine Maxine: What Denaun: You thinking about sucking my dick? Maxine: Yeah for a small price Denaun: For a small price? What you mean? Maxine: You know, money nigga Denaun: You don\'t need no damn money, I can\'t give you no money anyways, I heard you got some shit. Maxine: (laughing) What you, what you hear I got? Denaun: AIDS Maxine: (laughing) Who told you that bullshit? Denaun: My nigga Kyu, he wouldn\'t lie Maxine: Well if that\'s the case, Kyu got it then Denaun: Oh for real, it\'s like that? Maxine: (laughing) Well I ain\'t got shit, So he ain\'t got shit, and if he do, he ain\'t get that shit from me, I ain\'t fucking around with no 3rd nigga Denaun: Fuck that, I ain\'t fucking with you Maxine: No, see... Denaun: You got that shit, I ain\'t gotta fuck with you Maxine: Hold on, why it ain\'t even like that Denaun: I want y\'all to get paid, fucking... Maxine: (laughing as the phone hangs up)  \n ', " Hey yo, what's up man? Hey, yo you been here all day man Y'all been here every weekend man, I don't ever get a chance to rap first man! That's cause you whack! What?!? I ain't whack nigga, I got some raps for all y'all Nigga my raps fresh, I'ma bust my raps first, You can bust yours after me if you want to No no man, I'm going first, I'm getting tired of everybody wanted to go first man You always rap first, I'm rapping I don't care what none of y'all say, I'm fresh, I'm fresh  Thyme: Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Point him out man I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know I said who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Point him out bitch I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know  Verse 1: Eminem I'll have you taken back to Christ when you're sacrificed The way you're hacked and sliced when I fill your back with knives Jacking lives of MC's, now I'm set to launch a plan For blowing up the stage with illegal contraband I stomped your man so unless you want what he got You best just set the mic down, I'm steaming like a teapot I'll make the tea hot, people get in my face and ask If I wanna battle, then I chase them in a Jason mask It's an amazing task to battle with success I never gave a fuck, now I give a fuck less And in a slug fest I get physical like physicians Invisible like magicians with mystical mic traditions Wicked wizardry like a sorcerer, no remorse for you When I torture you throughout the course of my orchestra So feel the force of my spiritual images Slicing up an enemy's appendages till he hemorrhages My skin itches every time a rapper recites And when he's through with his verse, I'm all covered in flea bites You wanna see fights I got a match for you You couldn't flip shit playing in toilets with a spatula  Chorus: Thyme Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Point him out man I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Point him out bitch I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know  Verse 2: Eminem You bitches get a hysterectomy disrespecting me You wanna feel the full effect of me, hand a tech to me Intellectually superior, I'll make the whack wearier Inferior, deteriorate, like bacteria Materially, killing serially, clearly you'll see How much in fear when you hear me you'll be, and Shiver and shake, quiver and quake Bite a rhyme and feel your jaw get stiffer and ache, wither and break You slithering snake, gibbering fake, fibbering flake I'll twist you into a different shape And toss you in Michigan Lake, for fishermen's sake If this is a dream you'd wish you can wake Every diss you can take, personal We ain't friends trying to make amends If you ain't ever stole a gate you can take a fence (take offense) I make intense masterpieces and smash to pieces Your last releases, you pass diseases, that's the reason I'm showing you the proper way to operate a mic So pass it like a hot potato I've never been less than clever and fresh Severing flesh of fools who never impressed ever infest  Chorus: Thyme Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Point him out man I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic man and said that you can flow? Point him out bitch I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and then said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know Whhhooo the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Point him out! I wanna know Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? (Scratched in) I wanna know, I wanna know Ayo let me get that mic man' Who the fuck passed you the mic and said that you can flow? Who the fuck passed you the mic, who the fuck passed you the mic! I got the rhymes bitch, I'll kick that shit  \n ", " Denaun what up man? What up dog? Ya all right? Chillen, cold as hell Yes it is, hey Bus didn't come here did it? No, hey look, you got fifteen cent? Nah, I got just enough to get on the bus, I'm broke We gotta go to the store right man quick 'cause I'm short Yeah, we gonna have enough time to go to the store? Nah, look... You should just, how much you got there? I only got 75, you know what I'm sayin' I'm sure I got a dollar know what I mean... Just throw it in there they ain't gonna know You know what they look, I'm sick of taking this darn bus everywhere man You gotta make some moves or something I know look, I'm trying to get rich, I got a baby on the way, I don't even got a car, You know what I'm saying? I still stay with my mom, 21 and still with my mom Look hey, we gotta make some hit records or something, You know what I'm saying? 'Cause I'm tired of being broke  Cause all I do is yearn a life without a concern And dream of having a turn to earn money to burn Mapping out my strategies to get rich huh My desire is like a scratch that needs to get itched huh Cause man I live in the D, this crap ain't given for free Nothing's different to me, so what, it's easy to see I'll be the prisoner to flee, all of this misery I'm not wishing to be another fish in the sea But just an MC, so listen to me, but if you disagree You missing the key, you ain't even in the vicinity Unconditionally my aspects to cash checks My objects were never to swab decks It's up to you the decision is yours If what you vision is tours, or a mission less course When this shit is in the stores, cause you can be a star  No matter wherever you are, you're never too far From revenue huh, cause you can be king You can rule the world, you can do anything It's on you baby, cause you can be a star No matter wherever you are, you're never too far From revenue huh, cause you can be king You can rule the world, you can do anything It's on you baby, cause you can be a star No matter wherever you are, you're never too far From revenue huh  You know what I'm saying, see what I'm talking about man? Cause that's it Yeah A million dollars ain't even that far away man Yo we got to get the money man, I can't be broke for the rest of my life Yeah I hear what your saying, Look there's got to be something better, you know what I'm saying? I can't live like this for the rest of my life man, Bumming rides everywhere I go Yeah, what's up with Lexus' and Land cruisers'?  Yo I'm not about to chance it and dismiss handling business I'm canceling Christmas to gamble and risk this Financial interest is the matter at hand I got an adequate plan for stab at a grand I grab what I can and do what I must Pursue what I lust, it's true that I just choose The few that I trust, thems the people that I still got F*** with gangsta fill pot, get your grill shot The 5 Elemantz for life my man Thyme Proof, Kyu and Denaun, we move through into time My crews true and divine, we never fronted We just wanted to be funded, and live to be a hundred Instead of hunted or being wanted as fugitives It's all about a man planning what his future is What he can do for his to be a star  No matter wherever you are, you're never too far From revenue huh, cause you can be king You can rule the world, you can do anything It's on you baby, cause you can be a star No matter wherever you are, you're never too far From revenue huh, cause you can be king You can rule the world, you can do anything It's on you baby, cause you can be a star No matter wherever you are, you're never too far From revenue huh  That's what I'm talking about, I'm not trying to be the player, I'm trying to be the man, I'm want to be President Yo forgot that President man I'm trying to be king, Making dead presidents, you know what I'm saying? Yeah Getting money anytime I want owning my own businesses and all that, You know what I'm saying? Yeah, I'm trying to be a millionare man, hahaha, but don't all you know You only live once Ninety six baby  \n ", " Women Singing: Ain't no one special, special like you No one's special, special like you (3X) I been searching, but you're the one I want in my life baby (4X)  Verse 1: Eminem I'm reminiscing on your tenderness and the snuggling and teasing Missing what I remember, kissing and hugging and squeezing Bugging and weezing, I'm having trouble when breathing It's even tougher when sleeping But there's a couple of reasons that I'm suffering and grieving For loving and leaving, you're all I'm thinking of in the evening You got my knees buckling and weakening Thoughts of nothing but freaking that I'm struggling to keep in And interrupt when I'm speaking I got some game that I'm preparing to run The way your lips sparkle and they glare in the sun You got your hair in a bun, no matter what you're wearing you stun Cause your comparing to none, I wanna share in the fun I feel a passionate lust when I'm imagining just us alone at last with a Touch I see you grasping to trust, but my intentions are good The seed is passing in dust I'm not asking to rush and answer me immediately I just wanna be there for you and you to be there for me If you agree to repeat after me, I Love You (I love you baby) 'Cause I just need you to see, how much I'm eager to be Your man legally wed, your love's keeping me fed This is easily said, so you can lead or be led If you care to be down cause ain't nobody Like you no where to be found  Women Singing: I been searching, but your the one I want in my life baby (4X)  Verse 2: Denaun Porter Baby it's all on you, it's you I call on boo Let's set a day up so you can fall on through We'll take a spin in a Lexus you can chill for dinner and breakfast Long enough to see how this gentleman sex'es We'll start it out with caviar, Don Parigne And then when it's a fact we are warm, carry on We'll take it slow, see nobody will hurry things I got the herbs the Bacardi and Hurricane If Daiquiris are in debate and not your thing that day It's still all right 'cause I got Minute Maid and Tangeray Your an incredible one that's rare, in bed with edible underwear You look impeccable, nothing compares I dream of freaking you, the women that will speak it too so It seems that there is not an end to things that we can do so Now we all set to play, only thing left to say is When you step away, baby but don't forget the Neglicie  Women Singing: I been searching, but your the one I want in my life baby (8X) (Fades) No one special, special like you (2X)  \n ", ' Police voice: Attention all units, attention all units We have an All Points Bulletin out on a man with green hair I repeat, we have an APB on a man with green hair He\'s armed with a knife, I repeat, he\'s armed with a knife Proceed with caution, watch your back fella\'s He could be coming at your girlfriend next  There\'s a joker on the loose from the psychiatric ward His face is up on the bulletin board with a reward He\'ll stab you with a sword don\'t be fooled by his charm He\'s probably armed with intent to do bodily harm Ring the alarm, look for a man with green hair Check at your girl\'s house, he was last seen there He\'s has a mean stare but usually crack\'s jokes Good luck on your mission and guard your backs folks  I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good!  We got the walkie-talkies to keep us all informed Suited up head to toe in detective uniforms Our unit storms in, we split the ghetto in sectors Locking down every block and put up metal detectors Protectors and be sure that you stand close Watch each others backs and guard your command post And most of all be advised that he\'s wise He could be disguised as one of your very own guys  I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good!  I\'m on a solo mission to find him personally To settle the score and beat then him mercifully For what he first did to me It\'s sure to be the last Following footprints with a magnifying glass To drag his lying ass back to his padded cell I\'m mad as hell, on the trail of the tattle tail I heard a yell the voice sounded familiar "Give me your girlfriend or I\'m gonna kill ya"  I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good!  I followed the voice that led down a flight of steps Sneezing at dust, and swinging at the spider-webs Inside the depths of his basement I taste lint in my mouth, then the lights in the place\' went! I saw my life flash in front of my eyes I felt a butcher knife slash at one of my thighs None of my guys knew where I\'m at I was doomed Then I remembered the flashlight in my costume  I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good!  Dealing with backstabber\'s there was one thing I learned They\'re only powerful when you got your back turned I yearned for the day that we finally met again So I can give him a taste of his own medicine He shed his skin, then he promised to come clean I took his butcher knife and jabbed it into his spleen Cut him at the seam then dragged the fella home Beating him over the head with the telephone  Police voice: Attention all cars, attention all cars Unit 313 has apprehended the suspect He\'s going back to the crazy home, I repeat He\'s going back to the crazy home, how about that?  I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good! I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good! I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Hit a bitch snake from the back, I make you think you\'re a best friend then Why I oughtta Stay away from him he ain\'t no good!  \n ', ' Men singing: Jealous! (8X)  Girls voice: (Talking over the singing) Jealous!?! What he mean jealous, know what I\'m saying? He just mad \'cause he got with some ugly hoes, know what I\'m saying? Girls don\'t buy him no clothes, He bought that ho some clothes! He don\'t buy me no clothes, Nigga ain\'t got no money, no vibe, no dick I mean, What do I got to be jealous for? He ain\'t gonna make it no where, he ain\'t got no type of time He has no career move, I mean...  I come home every single day from working double shifts And stop along the way to pick you up a couple gifts I come inside and you pretend you miss me when you kiss me Then you diss me and we strenuously fight continuously Again you frisk me, for numbers trying to bust me It must be only just because you never learned to trust me Plus we only squabble only irrelevant issues Too many tissues, for my feelings you misuse I buy you jewelry, you make a fool of me I bring you diamond rings you say I\'m bad at timing things So what\'s a man to do when all I hand to you is handed back to me You act to be this gangsta bitch, that ain\'t what first attracted me I used to love your company now you always bugging me For information and you tell your friends you plan on dumping me So I\'ma wait for your evacuation Cause every accusation makes me wanna smack your face in See I\'ve never been so sure, and your just insecure So my solution to your jealousy presents a cure I recommend you take your things and check them in Look at the nervous wreck I\'m in, I need my second wind, Say What?  Chorus: Men Singing Jealous, Jealousy, Jealousy (8X)  Women\'s Voice: (Talking over singing) Fuck you and what you going through Fuck Eminem, he just mad \'cause I left that nigga for another man Me and Eminem don\'t need nothing but my and his money Immature, Me? Nigga ain\'t got no dick, no swang in his thang Know what I\'m saying? He just mad \'cause I\'m getting it all night Jealous of me, know what I\'m saying? That\'s what I\'m talking about Mother fucker just trying to get his pussy  I used to be a puppet and a sucker for your silent treatments I used to be intoxicated with your sweet sense Until the day I started following your feetprints And tapping in your phone conversations through the heat vents It made complete sense, there\'s someone else you like So I confronted you and asked you who was Mike? And you was like, **I need a new nigga** (sampled) Someone rich that I could follow And you\'ll be over me by the time you see tomorrow Leaving me in sorrow, Brandy never felt so broken hearted I fell apart when you departed then the joking started I was an open target, you play comedian And I became the laughing stock. but now I\'m on my feet again And so we meet again, your acting like an ex-wife All in my sex life, I got a message from Phife He goes, "You didn\'t want me to see you then, I don\'t want you now" Take a towel, wipe your brow, quit trying to hunt me down You run me down and now your trying to apologize For all the lies and every time you made me ball my eyes Because I got a bigger wallet size, you wanna swing it Jealousy is in the house y\'all, Fellas sing it...  Chorus: Men Singing Jealous, Jealousy, Jealousy (12X)  \n ', ' (Slim Shady) "Eminem!"  (Eminem) "No!"  (Slim Shady) "Eminem!"  (Eminem) "No!"  (Slim Shady Laughs) "Wake the fuck up, motherfucker!"  (Eminem) "What do you want from me?!"  (Slim Shady laughs again) "Remember me?"  (Eminem) "I killed you!"  (Slim Shady) "You thought I was dead, didn\'t you?"  (Eminem) "What do you want from me!?"  (Slim Shady) "I\'m alive!"  (Eminem) "Oh, my God!"  (Slim Shady) "Get up."  (Eminem) "No!"  (Slim Shady) "Get up and look in the mirror."  (Eminem) "I don\'t want to!"  (Slim Shady) "Look in the mirror, to see your reflection."  (Eminem) "Leave me alone!"  (Slim Shady Laughs again) "Look in the mirror --- you\'re nothing! you\'re nothing without me! Look in the motherfucking mirror!"  (Eminem) "NO!" [Glass Shatters]  \n ', ' Warning, this shit\'s gon be rated R, restricted You see this bullet hole in my neck? It\'s self inflicted Doctor slapped my momma, "Bitch you got a sick kid" Arrested, molested myself and got convicted Wearing visors, sunglasses and disguises Cause my split personality is having an identity crisis I\'m Dr. Hyde and Mr. Jekyl Disrespectful Hearing voices in my head while these whispers echo "Murder Murder Redrum" Brain size of a bread crumb Which drug will I end up dead from Inebriated, till my stress is eleviated "How in the fuck can Eminem and shady be related?" Illiterate, illigitimate shit spitter Bitch getter, hid in the bush like Margot Kidder Jumped out (Ah!) killed the bitch and did her Use to let the babysitter suck my dick when I was little\'er Smoke a blunt while I\'m titty fuckin\' Bette Midler Sniper, waiting on your roof like the Fiddler Y\'all thought I was gonna rhyme with Riddler Didn\'t Ya? Bring your bitch I wanna see if this dick gon\' fit in her  (Redman Sample) I\'m low down and I\'m shiftee And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack\'em And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from  I lace tunes, I\'m out this world like Space Moons With a bunch crazed loons dismissin brains like braze wounds Nothing but idiots and misfits, dipshits Doing whippits, passed out like Sanford snippits Where\'s the weed, I wanna tamper with it I\'ma let your grandpa hit it Mix it up with cocaine so her can\'t forget it Fuck it, maybe I\'m a bum But I was put on this earth to make your baby mama cum So what I\'m on is way beyond the bomb or any alcoholic beverage Losing all of my leverage Went up inside the First National Bank broke, and left rich Walking bio-hazard causing wreckage Smoked out like? Band just making my neck itch What the fuck? Gimme the tech bitch You just lost your tip, there\'s a pubic hair in my breakfast Got shit popping off like bottle cap tips Get your cap peeled like the dead skin of your mama\'s chapped lips Slap hips, support domestic violence Beat your bitches ass while your kids stare in silence I\'m just joking, is Dirty Dozen\'s really dust smoking? If all your shit\'s missing, than probably one of us broke in  My head\'s ringing, like it was Spider Sense tingling Lit it like Green Bay did when they shitted on New England I\'m out the game, put the second string in This Brandy got my swinging Bobbing back and forth like a penguin Delinquent, toking microphones with Broken English Make your mama be like "Oh! This is good! Who sing this?" "Slim Shady, his tape is dope, I love it It\'s rugged, but he needs to quit talking all that drug shit." It was predicted by a medic I\'d grow to be an addicted diabetic Living off liquid Triametic Pathetic, but I don\'t think this headache\'s ever vanishing Panicing, I think I might have just took too much Anasin Frozen Manaquin, posted stiffer than a statue I think I\'m dying, God is that you? Somebody help me, before I OD on an LP Take me to ER ASAP for and IV Motherfuck JOP, they don\'t support no hip hop They say that\'s where it ends, the closest they gon come is Tupac It\'s politics, it\'s all a fix Setup by these white blue collared hicks Just to make a dollar off of black music With a subliminal ball of tricks But those can kiss ass and swallow dicks  \n ', '  Spoken : Life; by Marshall Mathers. What is life? Life is like a big obstacle in front of your optical to slow you down, and every time you think you gotten past it, it\'s gonna come back around and tackle you to the damn ground. What are friends? Friends are people that you think are your friends, but they really your enemies with secret identities and disguises to hide they true colors. So just when you think you close enough to be brothers, they wanna come back and cut your throat when you ain\'t lookin\'. What is money? Money is what makes a man act funny. Money is the root of all evil. Money\'ll make them same friends come back around, swearing that they was always down! What is life? I\'m tired of life!  I\'m tired of backstabbing ass snakes with friendly grins I\'m tired of committing so many sins Tired of always giving in when this bottle of Henny wins Tired of never having any ends Tired of having skinny friends hooked on crack and mini-thins I\'m tired of this DJ playing your shit when he spins Tired of not having a deal Tired of having to deal with the bullshit without grabbing the steel Tired of drowning in my sorrow Tired of having to borrow a dollar for gas to start my Monte Carlo I\'m tired of motherfuckers spraying shit and dartin\' off I\'m tired of jobs startin\' off at five fifty an hour Then this boss wonders why I\'m smartin\' off I\'m tired of being fired every time I fart and cough Tired of having to work as a gas station clerk For this jerk breathing down my neck, driving me berserk I\'m tired of using plastic silverware Tired of working in Building Square, tired of not being a millionaire  But if I had a million dollars I\'d buy a damn brewery and turn the planet into alcoholics If I had a magic wand I\'d make the world suck my dick without a condom on while I\'m on the john If I had a million bucks It wouldn\'t be enough, \'cause I\'d still be out robbing armored trucks If I had one wish I would ask for a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss  I\'m tired of being white trash: broke and always poor Tired of taking pop bottles back to the party store Tired of not having a phone Tired of not having a home to have one in if I did have one on Tired of not driving a BM Tired of not working at GM, tired of wanting to be him Tired of not sleeping without a Tylenol PM Tired of not performing in a packed coliseum Tired of not being on tour Tired of fucking the same blonde whore after work in the back of a Contour I\'m tired of faking knots with a stack of ones Having a lack of funds and resorting back to guns Tired of being stared at Tired of wearing the same damn Nike Air hat Tired of stepping in clubs wearing the same pair of Lugz Tired of people saying they\'re tired of hearing me rap about drugs Tired of other rappers who ain\'t bringin\' half the skill as me Saying they wasn\'t feeling me on "Nobody\'s As Ill As Me" I\'m tired of radio stations telling fibs Tired of JLB saying "Where Hip-Hop Lives"  But if I had a million dollars I\'d buy a damn brewery and turn the planet into alcoholics If I had a magic wand I\'d make the world suck my dick without a condom on while I\'m on the john If I had a million bucks It wouldn\'t be enough, \'cause I\'d still be out robbing armored trucks If I had one wish I would ask for a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss   Spoken : You know what I\'m saying? I\'m tired of all of this bullshit! Telling me to be positive? How\'m I \'posed to be positive when I don\'t see shit positive?! You know what I\'m sayin\'? I rap about shit around me, shit I see, know what I\'m sayin\'? Right now I\'m tired of everything! Tired of all this playa hating that\'s going on in my own city, can\'t get no airplay, you know what I\'m sayin\'? But hey, it\'s cool though, you know what I\'m sayin\'? Just fed up! That\'s my word!  \n ', ' Whoa! A get your hands in the air, and get to clappin\' \'em And like, back and forth because ah This is... what you thought it wasn\'t... It beez.. the brothers representin\' the Dirty Dozen I be the F-R-O the double G *coughing* And check out the man he goes by the name of er...  Slim Shady, brain dead like Jan Brady I\'m a M80, you Lil\' like that Kim lady I\'m buzzin\', Dirty Dozen, naughty rotten rhymer Cursin\' at you players worse than Marty Schottenheimer You wacker than the motherfucker you bit your style from You ain\'t gon\' sell two copies if you press a double album Admit it, fuck it, while we comin\' out in the open I\'m doin\' acid, crack, smack, coke and smokin\' dope then My name is Marshall Mathers, I\'m an alcoholic  (Hi Marshall)  I have a disease and they don\'t know what to call it Better hide your wallet cause I\'m comin\' up quick to strip your cash Bought a ticket to your concert just to come and whip your ass Bitch, I\'m comin\' out swingin\', so fast it\'ll make your eyes spin You gettin\' knocked the fuck out like Mike Tyson The Proof is in the puddin\', just ask the Deshaun Holton I\'ll slit your motherfuckin\' throat worse than Ron Goldman  So when you see me on your block with two glocks Screamin\' "Fuck the world," like 2Pac I just don\'t give a fuck!! Talkin\' that shit behind my back, dirty mackin\' Tellin\' your boys that I\'m on crack I just don\'t give a fuck!!  So put my tape back on the rack Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack I just don\'t give a fuck!! But see me on the street and duck \'Cause you gon\' get stuck, stoned and snuffed \'Cause I just don\'t give a fuck!!  I\'m nicer than Pete, but I\'m on a search to crush a milkbone I\'m everlasting, I melt Vanilla Ice like silicone I\'m ill enough to just straight up diss you for no reason I\'m colder than snow season when it\'s twenty below freezin\' Flavor with no seasonin\', this is the sneak preview I\'ll diss your magazine and still won\'t get a weak review I\'ll make your freak leave you, smell the Folgers crystals This is a lyrical combat, gentlemen hold your pistols But I form like Voltron and blast you with my shoulder missiles Slim Shady, M&amp;M was the old initials  (Bye-bye!)  Extortion, snortin\', supportin\' abortion Pathological liar, blowin\' shit outta proportion The looniest, zaniest, spontaneous, sporadic Impulsive thinker, compulsive drinker, addict Half animal, half man Dumpin\' your dead body inside of a fuckin\' trash can With more holes than an Afghan  So when you see me on your block with two glocks Screamin\' "Fuck the world," like 2Pac I just don\'t give a fuck!! Talkin\' that shit behind my back, dirty mackin\' Tellin\' your boys that I\'m on crack I just don\'t give a fuck!!  So put my tape back on the rack Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack I just don\'t give a fuck!! But see me on the street and duck \'Cause you gon\' get stuck, stoned and snuffed \'Cause I just don\'t give a fuck!!  Somebody let me out this limousine  (Hey, let me out!)  I\'m a caged demon, on stage screamin\' like Rage Against the Machine I\'m convinced I\'m a fiend, shootin\' up while this record is spinnin\' Clinically brain dead, I don\'t need a second opinion Fuck droppin\' the jewel, I\'m flippin\' the sacred treasure I\'ll bite your motherfuckin\' style, just to make it fresher I can\'t take the pressure, I\'m sick of bitches Sick of naggin\' bosses bitchin\' while I\'m washin\' dishes In school I never said much, too busy havin\' a head rush Doin\' too much rush had my face flushed like red blush Then I went to Jim Beam, that\'s when my face grayed Went to gym in 8th grade, raped the women\'s swim team Don\'t take me for a joke I\'m no comedian Too many mental problems got me snortin\' coke and smokin\' weed again I\'m goin\' up over the curb, drivin\' on the median Finally made it home, but I don\'t got the key to get in  So when you see me on your block with two glocks Screamin\' "Fuck the world," like 2Pac I just don\'t give a fuck!! Talkin\' that shit behind my back, dirty mackin\' Tellin\' your boys that I\'m on crack I just don\'t give a fuck!!  So put my tape back on the rack Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack I just don\'t give a fuck!! But see me on the street and duck \'Cause you fin\' ta get stuck, stoned and snuffed \'Cause I just don\'t give a fuck!!   Shit, fuck everyone!  Outsidaz... Pace One... Young Zee...  Fuck the entire world!   \n ', " Intro: Frogg  Whoa! A get your hands in the air, and get to clappin 'em And like, back and forth because ah This is... what you thought it wasn't It beez... the brothers representin' the Dirty Dozen I be the F-R-O the double G *coughing in background* And check out the man he goes by the name of er...  Verse One: Eminem  Slim Shady, brain dead like Jim Brady I'm a M80, you Lil' like that Kim lady I'm buzzin, Dirty Dozen, naughty rotten rhymer Cursin at you players worse than Marty Schottenheimer You wacker than the motherfucker you bit your style from You ain't gonna sell two copies if you press a double album Admit it, fuck it, while we comin' out in the open I'm doin' acid, crack, smack, coke and smokin' dope then My name is Marshall Mathers, I'm an alcoholic (Hi Marshall) I have a disease and they don't know what to call it Better hide your wallet 'cause I'm comin' up quick to strip your cash Bought a ticket to your concert just to come and whip your ass Bitch, I'm comin' out swingin', so fast it'll make your eyes spin You gettin' knocked the fuck out like Mike Tyson The +Proof+ is in the puddin', just ask the Deshaun Holton I'll slit your motherfuckin throat worse than Ron Goldman  So when you see me on your block with two glocks Screamin Fuck the World like Tupac I just don't give a fuuuuuck! Talkin' that shit behind my back, dirty mackin Tellin' your boys that I'm on crack I just don't give a fuuuuuck! So put my tape back on the rack Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack I just don't give a fuuuuuck! But see me on the street and duck Cause you gon' get stuck, stoned, and snuffed 'Cause I just don't give a fuuuuuck!  Verse Two: Eminem  I'm Nicer than Pete, but I'm on a Serch to crush a Miilkbone I'm Everlast-ing, I melt Vanilla Ice like silicone I'm ill enough to just straight up diss you for no reason I'm colder than snow season when it's twenty below freezin Flavor with no seasonin, this is the sneak preview I'll diss your magazine and still won't get a weak review I'll make your freak leave you, smell the Folgers crystals This is a lyrical combat, gentlemen hold your pistols But I form like Voltron and blast you with my shoulder missiles Slim Shady, Eminem was the old initials (Bye-bye!) Extortion, snortin, supportin abortion Pathological liar, blowin' shit out of proportion The looniest, zaniest, spontaneous, sporadic Impulsive thinker, compulsive drinker, addict Half animal, half man Dumpin your dead body inside of a fuckin' trash can With more holes than an Afghan  Verse Three: Eminem  Somebody let me out this limousine (hey, let me out!) I'm a caged demon, on stage screamin like Rage Against the Machine I'm convinced I'm a fiend, shootin up while this record is spinnin Clinically brain dead, I don't need a second opinion Fuck droppin' the jewel, I'm flippin the sacred treasure I'll bite your motherfuckin style, just to make it fresher I can't take the pressure, I'm sick of bitches Sick of naggin bosses bitchin while I'm washin dishes In school I never said much, too busy havin' a headrush Doin' too much rush had my face flushed like red blush Then I went to Jim Beam, that's when my face grayed Went to gym in eighth grade, raped the women's swim team Don't take me for a joke I'm no comedian Too many mental problems got me snortin coke and smokin' weed again I'm goin' up over the curb, drivin' on the median Finally made it home, but I don't got the key to get in  Outro: Eminem  Hey, fuck that! Outsidaz... Pace One... Young Zee...  \n ", " Come on hey hey we goin' to the beach Grab a couple of toys and let dada strap you in the car seat Where's Mama? She's takin' a little nap in the trunk Oh that smell dada must have run over a skunk Now I know what you're thinkin': It's kind of late to go swimmin' But you know your mama she's one of those types of women Who does crazy things and if she don't get her way she'll throw a fit Don't play with daddy's toy knife, honey, let go of it And don't be so upset, why you actin' bashful? Don't you wanna help dadda build a sand castle? And mama said she wants to show how far she can float And don't worry about that little boo-boo on her throat It's just a little scratch it don't hurt Her was eatin' dinner while you was sleepin' and spilled ketchup on her shirt Mama's messy, isn't she, we'll let her wash off in the water And me and you can play by ourselves, can't we?  Just the two of us (sung) repeat 8-9 times  There's a place called heaven and a place called hell A place called prison and a place called jail And dada's probably on his way to all of 'em except one 'Cause mama's got a new husband and a stepson And you don't want a brother do ya? (Na) Maybe when you're old enough to understand a little better, I'll explain it to ya But for now we'll just say that mama was real, real bad She was bein' mean to dad and made him real, real mad But I still feel sad that I put her in time out Sit back in your chair honey, quit tryin' to climb out I told you it's okay, hey hey, wanna baba? Take a night-night, nana-boo, goo-goo ga-ga Humma goo-goo caca, dad'll change your dighty Clean the baby up so her can take a nighty-nighty You're dad'll wake her up as soon as we get to the water '97 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my daughter  Just the two of us (sung)  Wake up sleepy head we're here Before we play, we're gonna take mama for a little walk along the pier Baby, don't cry honey, don't get the wrong idea Mama's too sleepy to hear you screamin' in her ear That's why you can't get her to wake But don't worry, dada made a nice bed for mama at the bottom of the lake Here, you wanna help dada tie a rope around this rock? We'll tie it to her footsies then will roll her off the dock Ready now, here we go, on the count of three One, two, three... weeeeeeeeee There goes mama splashin' in the water No more fightin' your dad, no more restrainin' order No more step dada, no more new brother Blow her kisses bye-bye, tell mama you love her We'll go play in the sand, build a castle and junk But first, just help dad with two more things out the trunk  Just the two of us (sung)  \n ", '   Bizarre   Yeah... ha ha ha (BANG!), Yeah, Bizarre Kid comin\' at you Eminem and Fuzz, and Mr. Swifty, ha ha  No one\'s iller than me (wha?) No one, no one is iller than me No one is iller than me It\'s Mr. Swifty from the 313...    Swift   I make rappers wanna turn into singers I keep hoes lickin\' they fingers Bring this competition and face this meanin\' Got your whole crew doing subpeonas Hell nah you ain\'t seen a crew genius Murder whoever\'s between us, pack your heaters Keep it close, you can\'t beat us While your whole crew treat us like G\'s, you best believe this I done made quadrapalegics outta these non-rappin\' rejects While the whole world ejects your tape, it ain\'t no secret That your shit sounds fake, you can\'t stop it my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate I\'m like Two-Face, I\'m painful to rappers then you can tell From these shells, how I gotta bend \'em like route canals I erase all trails, somethin\' farther from gettin\' bail Makes you wanna kill an emcee yourself, you might as well Be within a 25 to life sentence, on linkin\' trials Horrified, and keep on frontin\', repentin\' and lose they bowels Everything is foul when Swift\'s around, vacate now Niggas dumb enough to try to front and escape, how? I\'m gonna take this \'gnac and drink it straight wild Niggas steady fallin\' in my face like milk crates, BLAAAOW!  It\'s Swifty from the 313 Like I said no one is iller than me, unnhh!    Fuzz   Me and Eminem and Mike Drivin\' down Van Dyke Get my dick sucked late at night by a fuckin\' transvestite Still on probation for stranglin\' my boy Jason Should be takin\' my medication, it\'s 9 to 10 I\'m facin\' Last week this old man I had to blast \'Cause he tried to help me out when my car was out of gas Ripped this old lady, hung her neck by a hook Didn\'t realize it was my grandmother till I checked her pocketbook Fuckin\' with the white boys got me back on crack Better explain where the hell your TVs and VCRs is at I done lost 100 pounds, I ain\'t been eatin\' like I should This wounded dog in the street is sure lookin\' good! Rob this little boy in his fuckin\' paper route Throwin\' bottles at day care centers and yell "EVERYBODY GET OUT"! My girl beat my ass and shot me in the back with a 2-piece \'Cause she found out I was havin\' an affair with her 10-year old niece  No one, no one\'s iller than me It\'s Bizarre Kid straight from the 313 No one, no one is iller than me It\'s Bizarre Kid straight from the 313    Eminem   Nobody better test me, \'cause I don\'t wanna get messy Especially when I step inside this bitch, dick freshly New Lugz, give the crew hugs, guzzle two mugs Before I do drugs that make me throw up like flu bugs True thugs, rugged unshaven messy scrubs Whippin\' 40-bottles like the fuckin\' Pepsi clubs Down a fifth, crack open a six I\'m on my seventh 8-ball, now I gotta take a piss I\'m hollerin\' at these hoes that got boyfriends Who gives a fuck who they was I\'m always takin\' someone else\'s girl like Cool J does They probably don\'t be packin\' anyways, do they Fuzz? We walked up, stomped they asses and blew they buzz Mics get sandblasted Stab your abdomen with a hand crafted pocketknife and spill your antacid Sprayed your motherfuckin\' crib up when I ran past it Fuckin\' felon, headed to hell in a handbasket Talkin\' shit will get you, your girl and your man blasted Kidnapped and slapped in a van wrapped in Saran plastic Get your damn ass kicked, by these fantastic Furious four motherfuckers Flashin\' in front of your face without the Grand Masters  Slim Shady, ain\'t nobody iller than me    Fuzz   I run shit like an ass with legs Massive lead to leave your cabbage red Similar to your ass in a casket dead Drastic spread of acid heads Come to abort you like a bastard egg That trash you said got you standin\' on plastic legs Ask the feds from past the edge Rockin\' the most classic threads Flashin\' bread, roll down the window Bitch you got some fantastic legs, you can get till that ass get red You can get till that ass get red Bizarre you get him and him, Swift you get him and him I\'ll get him and him, leave the other two for my nigga Eminem Never writer\'s block, I block writers My block\'s tighter, ante up and get your top fighters Got fired for jumpin\' the counter with a mop stick Some bitch ran up screamin\' GET THE COPS QUICK! And got drop kicked, now she screamin\' "Stop it..." Got clips to stop shit, rock shit and grab this hot shit Wherever you shop bitch, Fuzz Scooter \'97 crop pick Sick a-y\'all niggaz lookin\' at me like I got tits I shoot a rocket through your optic You niggaz still don\'t know the top pick? I got bricks, lose my foot in your ass And have you shittin\' socks bitch! We rock shit, leave your fuckin\' knot split Grab the green from Al by showin\' him hot grits (No one...)  Ain\'t nobody iller than me    Bizarre   It\'s the Mr. Fuzzy from the 313 No one, no one is iller than me It\'s Eminem and Swift from the 313 No one, no one is iller than me It\'s Fuzz and Buzz-arre from the 313  You have now witnessed 4 ill emcees! From the home of potholes and trash We\'ll lyrically blast...  \n ', ' All I see is murder murder, my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate All I see is murder murder, my mind state Murder, murder, murder, and kill, kill, kill!  All I see is murder murder, my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate All I see is murder murder, my mind state Murder, murder, murder, and kill, kill, kill!  Left the keys in the van, with a Gat in each hand Went up in Eastland and shot a policeman Fuck a peace plan if a citizen bystands This shit is in my hands, here\'s your life span And for what your life\'s worth this money is twice that Grab a couple grand and lay-up in Iceland See I\'m a nice man but money turned me to Satan I\'m thirsty for this green so bad I\'m dehydratin\' Hurry up with the cash bitch, I got a ride waitin\' Shot a man twice in the back when he tried skatin\' I want the whole pie, I won\'t be denied nathan Maybe I need my head inside straightened Brain contemplatin\', clean out the register Dip before somebody catches ya Or gets your description an\' sketches ya Then connects you as the prime suspect But I ain\'t set to flee the scene of the crime just yet \'Cause I got a daughter to feed And $200 ain\'t enough to water the seed The best thing would be for me to leave Taco Bell an\' hit up Chess King And have the lady at the desk bring Money from the safe in the back, stepped in wavin\' the MAC Cooperate and we can operate and save an attack This bitch tried to escape in the jack Grabbed her by the throat, it\'s Murder She Wrote You barely heard a word as she choked It wasn\'t nuttin\' for her to be smoked Then I slammed her on her back till her vertebrae broke Just then the pigs bust in yellin\' "Freeze!" But I\'m already wanted for sellin\' ki\'s And a bunch of other felonies from A to Z like spellin\' bees So before I dropped to the ground and fell on knees I bust shots, they bust back Hit me square in the chest, I wasn\'t wearin\' a vest...  All I see is murder murder, my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate All I see is murder murder, my mind state Murder, murder, murder, and kill, kill, kill!  All I see is murder murder, my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate All I see is murder murder, my mind state Murder, murder, murder, and kill, kill, kill!  Left the house, pullin\' out the drive, backin\' out (?) Backin\' out, this lady\'s Jag started blackin\' out Pulled the MAC-10 out and stuck it in her face Shut ya yackin\' mouth before I blow the brain from out the back ya scalp Drug her by her hair, smacked her up Thinkin\' fuck it, mug her while you\'re there, jacked her up Stole her car, made a profit Grabbed a tape from out the deck and offed it out the window Like the girl on Set It Off did Jetted off kid, stole the whip, now I\'m a criminal Drove it through somebody\'s yard, dove into they swimmin\' pool Climbed out and collapsed on the patio I made it out alive but I\'m injured badly though Parents screamin\', "Johnny, go in and call the police. Tell \'em there\'s a crazy man disturbing all of the peace!" Tried to stall him at least long enough to let me leap up Run in they crib and at least leave with some little cheap stuff Actin\' like they never seen nobody hit a (?) before Smashed the window, grabbed the Nintendo 64 When they sell out in stores the price triples I ran up the block jumpin\' kids on tricycles And collided with an 80-year old lady with groceries There goes the cheese, eggs, milk and Post Toasties Stood up and started to see stars Too many siren sounds, it seemed like a thousand police cars Barely escaped, must o\' been some dumb-luck Jumped up and climbed the back of a movin\' dump truck But I think somebody seen me maybe Plus I lost the damn Nintendo and I must o\' dropped the Beanie Baby Fuck it I give up, I\'m surrounded in blue suits Came out with a white flag hollerin\' "Truce, truce!" (Don\'t shoot!) Surrendered my weapon to cops. "Wasn\'t me! It was the gangsta rap and the peppermint Schnopps."  All I see is murder murder, my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate All I see is murder murder, my mind state Murder, murder, murder, and kill, kill, kill!  All I see is murder murder, my mind state Makes it too late for cops in tryin\' to stop the crime rate All I see is murder murder, my mind state Murder, murder, murder, and kill, kill, kill!   (Scratches to fade out)   \n ', ' Life... by Marshall Mathers What is life? Life is like a big obstacle Put in front of your optical to slow you down And every time you think you gotten past it It\'s gonna come back around and tackle you to the damn ground What are friends? Friends are people that you think are your friends But they really your enemies, with secret indentities And disguises, to hide they true colors So just when you think you close enough to be brothers They wanna come back and cut your throat when you ain\'t lookin\' What is money? Money is what makes a man act funny Money is the root of all evil Money\'ll make them same friends come back around Swearing that they was always down What is life? I\'m tired of life I\'m tired of backstabbing ass snakes with friendly grins I\'m tired of committing so many sins Tired of always giving in when this bottle of Henny wins Tired of never having any ends Tired of having skinny friends hooked on crack and mini-thins I\'m tired of this DJ playing YOUR shit when he spins Tired of not having a deal Tired of having to deal with the bullshit without grabbing the steel Tired of drowning in my sorrow Tired of having to borrow a dollar for gas to start my Monte Carlo I\'m tired of motherfuckers spraying shit and dartin off I\'m tired of jobs startin off at five fifty an hour Then this boss wanders why I\'m smartin off I\'m tired of being fired every time I fart and cough Tired of having to work as a gas station clerk For this jerk breathing down my neck driving me bezerk I\'m tired of using plastic silverware Tired of working in Building Square Tired of not being a millionaire  But if I had a million dollars I\'d buy a damn brewery, and turn the planet into alcoholics If I had a magic wand, I\'d make the world suck my dick Without a condom on, while I\'m on the john If I had a million bucks It wouldn\'t be enough, because I\'d still be out Robbing armored trucks If I had one wish I would ask for a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss  I\'m tired of being white trash, broke and always poor Tired of taking pop bottles back to the party store I\'m tired of not having a phone Tired of not having a home to have one in if I did have it on Tired of not driving a BM Tired of not working at GM, tired of wanting to be him Tired of not sleeping without a Tylenol PM Tired of not performing in a packed coliseum Tired of not being on tour Tired of fucking the same blonde whore after work In the back of a Contour I\'m tired of faking knots with a stack of ones Having a lack of funds and resorting back to guns Tired of being stared at I\'m tired of wearing the same damn Nike Air hat Tired of stepping in clubs wearing the same pair of Lugz Tired of people saying they\'re tired of hearing me rap about drugs Tired of other rappers who ain\'t bringin\' half the skill as me Saying they wasn\'t feeling me on "Nobody\'s As Ill As Me" I\'m tired of radio stations telling fibs Tired of J-L-B saying "Where Hip-Hop Lives"  But if I had a million dollars I\'d buy a damn brewery, and turn the planet into alcoholics If I had a magic wand, I\'d make the world suck my dick Without a condom on, while I\'m on the john If I had a million bucks It wouldn\'t be enough, because I\'d still be out Robbing armored trucks If I had one wish I would ask for a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss  You know what I\'m saying? I\'m tired of all of this bullshit Telling me to be positive How\'m I \'sposed to be positive when I don\'t see shit positive? Know what I\'m sayin\'? I rap about shit around me, shit I see Know what I\'m sayin\'? Right now I\'m tired of everything Tired of all this player hating that\'s going on in my own city Can\'t get no airplay, you know what I\'m sayin\'? But hey, it\'s cool though, you know what I\'m sayin\'? Just fed up wid it That\'s my word y\'all  \n ', ' Intro by Frogg  Whoa! A get your hands in the air, and get to clappin \'em And like, back and forth because ah This is... what you thought it wasn\'t... It beez... the brothers representin\' the Dirty Dozen I be the F-R-O the double G (coughing in background) And check out the man he goes by the name of er...  Slim Shady, brain dead like Jim Brady I\'m a M80, you Lil\' like that Kim lady. I\'m buzzin, Dirty Dozen, naughty rotten rhymer Cursin at you players worse than Marty Schottenheimer. You wacker than the motherfucker you bit your style from You ain\'t go\' sell two copies if you press a double album. Admit it, fuck it, while we comin\' out in the open I\'m doin\' acid, crack, smack, coke and smokin\' dope then; My name is Marshall Mathers, I\'m an alcoholic (Hi Marshall) I have a disease and they don\'t know what to call it Better hide your wallet \'cause I\'m comin\' up quick to strip your cash Bought a ticket to your concert just to come and whip your ass Bitch, I\'m comin\' out swingin\', so fast it\'ll make your eyes spin You gettin\' knocked the fuck out like Mike Tyson The Proof is in the puddin\', just ask the Deshaun Holton I\'ll slit your motherfuckin throat worse than Ron Goldman  So when you see me on your block with two glocks Screamin "Fuck the World" like Tupac I just don\'t give a fuck! Talkin\' that shit behind my back, dirty mackin Tellin\' your boys that I\'m on crack I just don\'t give a fuck! So put my tape back on the rack Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack I just don\'t give a fuck! But see me on the street and duck Cause you gon\' get stuck, stoned, and snuffed \'Cause I just don\'t give a fuck!  I\'m Nicer than Pete, but I\'m on a Serch to crush a Milkbone I\'m Everlasting, I melt Vanilla Ice like silicone I\'m ill enough to just straight up diss you for no reason I\'m colder than snow season when it\'s twenty below freezin Flavor with no seasonin, this is the sneak preview I\'ll diss your magazine and still won\'t get a weak review I\'ll make your freak leave you, smell the Folgers crystals This is a lyrical combat, gentlemen hold your pistols But I form like Voltron and blast you with my shoulder missiles Slim Shady, M&amp;M was the old initials (Bye-bye!) Extortion, snortin, supportin abortion Pathological liar, blowin\' shit outta proportion The looniest, zaniest, spontaneous, sporadic Impulsive thinker, compulsive drinker, addict Half animal, half man Dumpin your dead body inside of a fuckin\' trash can With more holes than an Afghan  Somebody let me out this limousine (hey, let me out!) I\'m a caged demon, on stage screamin like Rage Against the Machine I\'m convinced I\'m a fiend, shootin up while this record is spinnin Clinically brain dead, I don\'t need a second opinion. Fuck droppin\' the jewel, I\'m flippin the sacred treasure I\'ll bite your motherfuckin style, just to make it fresher I can\'t take the pressure, I\'m sick of bitches Sick of naggin bosses bitchin while I\'m washin dishes In school I never said much, too busy havin\' a headrush Doin\' too much rush had my face flushed like red blush Then I went to Jim Beam, that\'s when my face grayed Went to gym in eighth grade, raped the women\'s swim team Don\'t take me for a joke I\'m no comedian Too many mental problems got me snortin coke and smokin\' weed again I\'m goin\' up over the curb, drivin\' on the median Finally made it home, but I don\'t got the key to get in  Hey, fuck that! Outsidaz... Pace One... Young Zee...  \n ', "   Jeff Bass   This is a public Service Announcement brought to you In part, by Slim Shady  The views and events expressed here are totally fucked And are not necessarily the views of anyone  However, the events and suggestions that appear On this album are not to be taken lightly  Children should not partake in the listening Of this album with laces in their shoes  Slim Shady is not responsible for your actions Upon purchasing this album You have agreed not to try this at home  Anything else?    Eminem   Yeah, Don't do drugs  \n ", ' Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (What?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (What?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady  (Ahem. Excuse me! Can I have the attention of the class for one second?)  Hi, kids! Do you like violence? (Yeah-yeah-yeah!) Wanna see me stick Nine Inch Nails through each one of my eyelids? (Uh-huh!) Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did? (Yeah yeah!) Try \'cid and get fucked up worse than my life is? (Huh?)  My brain\'s dead weight, I\'m tryin\' to get my head straight But I can\'t figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate (Umm...) And Dr. Dre said, "Slim Shady you a basehead!" Uh-uh! "Then why\'s your face red? Man, you wasted!"  Well, since age twelve, I\'ve felt like I\'m someone else \'Cause I hung my original self, from the top bunk with a belt Got pissed off, and ripped Pamela Lee\'s tits off And smacked her so hard, I knocked her clothes backwards like Kris Kross  I smoke a fat pound of grass, and fall on my ass Faster than a fat bitch, who sat down too fast C\'mere slut! (Shady, wait a minute, that\'s my girl, dawg!) I don\'t give a fuck, God sent me to piss the world off!  Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (What?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (What?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady  My English teacher wanted to flunk me in junior high Thanks a lot, next semester I\'ll be thirty-five I smacked him in his face with an eraser Chased him with a stapler, stapled his nuts to a stack of paper (Ow-w-w-w!)  Walked in the strip club, had my jacket zipped up Flashed the bartender, then stuck my dick in the tip cup Extra-terrestrial, running over pedestrians In a spaceship, while they\'re screamin\' at me, "Let\'s just be friends!"  Ninety-nine percent of my life I was lied to I just found out, my mom does more dope than I do (Damn!) I told her I\'d grow up to be a famous rapper Make a record about doin\' drugs and name it after her (Oh, thank you!)  You know you blew up when the women rush the stands And try to touch your hands like some screamin\' Usher fans (Ahh! Ahhhhh!) This guy at White Castle asked for my autograph (Dude, can I get your autograph?) So I signed it: \'Dear Dave, thanks for the support, asshole!\'  Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady  Stop the tape! This kid needs to be locked away! (Get him!) Dr. Dre, don\'t just stand there, operate! I\'m not ready to leave, it\'s too scary to die (Fuck that!) I\'ll have to be carried inside the cemetery and buried alive (Huh, yup!)  Am I comin\' or goin\'? I can barely decide I just drank a fifth of vodka, dare me to drive? (Go ahead) All my life I was very deprived I ain\'t had a woman in years, and my palms are too hairy to hide (Whoops!)  Clothes ripped like the Incredible Hulk (Hahh-too) I spit when I talk, I\'ll fuck anything that walks (C\'mere) When I was little I used to get so hungry I would throw fits How ya gonna breastfeed me, mom?! You ain\'t got no tits! (Waah, wahh!)  I lay awake and strap myself in the bed Put a bulletproof vest on and shoot myself in the head (Bang!) I\'m steamin\' mad, (Arrhh!) and by the way when you see my dad (Yeah?) Tell him that I slit his throat, in this dream I had  Hi! My name is... (What?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (What?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Who?) My name is... (Huh?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady Hi! My name is... (Huh?) My name is... (Who?) My name is... chika-chika, Slim Shady   As heard on: Curtain Call: The Hits   My English teacher wanted to have sex in junior high, the only problem was, my English teacher was a guy  Extra-terrestrial, killin\' pedestrians, rapin\' lesbians, while they screamin\' "Let\'s just be friends!  \n ', "   Narrator   Meet Eddie, 23 years old. Fed up with life and the way things are going, he decides to rob a liquor store. (I can't take this no more. I can't take it no more, homes.) But on his way in, he has a sudden change of heart. And suddenly, his conscience comes into play.    Dr. Dre   Alright, stop! (Huh?) Now before you walk in the door Of this liquor store and try to get money out the drawer You'd better think of the consequence (But who are you?) I'm your motherfuckin' conscience.    Eminem   That's nonsense. Go in and gaffle the money and run to one of your aunt's cribs And borrow a damn dress and one of her blonde wigs. (Can I borrow this?) Tell her you need a place to stay, you'll be safe for days If you shave your legs with Renee's razor blades    Dr. Dre   Yeah, but if it all goes through like it's supposed to The whole neighborhood knows you and they'll expose you. Think about it, before you walk in the door first. Look at the store clerk, she's older then George Burns.    Eminem   Fuck that. Do that shit. Shoot that bitch. Can you afford to blow this shit? Are you that rich? Why you give a fuck if she dies? Are you that bitch? Do you really think she gives a fuck if you have kids?    Dr. Dre   Man, don't do it. It's not worth it to risk it. (You're right.) Not over this shit. (Stop!) Drop the biscuit. (I will!) Don't even listen to Slim, yo. He's bad for you.    Eminem   You know what, Dre? I don't like your attitude.  (It's all right, c'mon, just come in here for a minute.) (Mmm, I don't know.) (Look, baby.) (Damn!) (Look, it's gonna be all right, right?) (Well, okay.)    Narrator   Meet Stan, 21 years old. After meeting a young girl at a rave party, Thing's start getting hot and heavy in an upstairs bedroom. Once again, his conscience comes into play.    Eminem   Now listen to me: while you're kissin' her cheek Smearin' her lipstick, I slip this in her drink. Now all you gotta do is nibble on this little bitch's earlobe...    Dr. Dre   Yo, this girl's only 15 years old. You shouldn't take advantage of her, it's not fair.    Eminem   Yo, look at her bush. Does it got hair? (Uh-huh.) Fuck this bitch right here on the spot bare Till she passes out and she forgot how she got there.    Dr. Dre    Man, ain't you ever seen that one movie  Kids ?    Eminem   No, but I seen the porno with Son Doobiest!    Dr. Dre   Shit, you wanna get hauled off to jail?    Eminem   Man, fuck that, hit that shit raw dawg and bail.  (Hee. It feels good to be home.)    Narrator   Meet Grady, a 29 year old construction worker. After coming home from a hard day's work,  He walks in the door of his trailer park home  To find his wife in bed with another man. (What the fuck?!) (Grady!!)    Dr. Dre   Alright, calm down. Relax, start breathin'.    Eminem   Fuck that shit, you just caught this bitch cheatin'. While you at work, she's with some dude, tryin' to get off? Fuck slittin' her throat! Cut this bitch's head off!!    Dr. Dre   Wait, what if there's an explanation for this shit?    Eminem    What? She tripped? Fell? Landed on his dick?    Dr. Dre   Alright, Shady. Maybe he's right, Grady. But think about the baby, Before you get all crazy.    Eminem   Okay! Thought about it. Still wanna stab her? Grab her by the throat, get your daughter and kidnap her That's what I did. Be smart, don't be a retard.  You gonna take advice from somebody who slapped Dee Barnes!?    Dr. Dre   What'd you say?     Eminem    What's wrong? Didn't think I'd remember?    Dr. Dre   Imma kill you, motherfucker!     Eminem   Ah-ah, temper, temper! Mr. Dre? Mr. N.W.A.? Mr. AK Coming straight outta Compton, y'all better make way? How in the fuck you gonna tell this man not to be violent?    Dr. Dre   'Cuz he don't need to go the same route that I went. Been there, done that.  Aw, fuck it, what am I sayin'? Shoot 'em both, Grady, where's your gun at? *gunshots*  \n ", '  Scalpel (Here) Sponge (Here) Wait, he\'s convulsing, he\'s convulsing (Ah) We\'re gonna have to shock him (Oh my, oh my God) We\'re gonna have to shock him (Oh my God)   These are the results of a thousand electric volts A neck with bolts, (Nurse we\'re losin\' him, check the pulse) A kid who refused to respect adults Wore spectacles with taped frames and a freckled nose A corny lookin\' white boy, scrawny and always ornery \'Cause I was always sick of brawny bullies pickin\' on me And I might snap, one day just like that I decided to strike back and flatten every tire on the bike rack My first day in junior high, this kid said "It\'s you and I, three o\'clock sharp this afternoon you die" I looked at my watch it was 1:20 (I already gave you my lunch money what more do you want from me?) He said, "Don\'t try to run from me, you\'ll just make it worse" My palms were sweaty, and I started to shake at first Something told me, "Try to fake a stomach ache it works" I screamed, "Ow, my appendix feels like they could burst Teacher, teacher, quick I need a naked nurse" (What\'s the matter?) I don\'t know, my leg, it hurts" (Leg? I thought you said it was your tummy?) Oh, I mean it is, but I also got a bum knee (Mr. Mathers, the fun and games are over And just for that stunt, you\'re gonna get some extra homework) But don\'t you wanna give me after school detention? (Nah, that bully wants to beat your ass and I\'mma let him)  Brain damage, ever since the day I was born Drugs is what they used to say I was on They say I never knew which way I was goin\' But everywhere I go they keep playin\' my song  Brain damage, ever since the day I was born Drugs is what they used to say I was on They say I never knew which way I was goin\' But everywhere I go they keep playin\' my song Brain damage  Way before my baby daughter Hailey I was harassed daily by this fat kid named D\'Angelo Bailey An eighth grader who acted obnoxious, \'cause his father boxes So everyday he\'d shove me in the lockers One day he came in the bathroom while I was pissin\' And had me in the position to beat me into submission He banged my head against the urinal till he broke my nose Soaked my clothes in blood, grabbed me and choked my throat I tried to plead and tell him, "We shouldn\'t beef" But he just wouldn\'t leave, he kept chokin\' me and I couldn\'t breathe He looked at me and said, "You gonna die honkey" The principal walked in (What\'s going on in here?) And started helpin\' him stomp me I made them think they beat me to death Holdin\' my breath for like five minutes before they finally left Then I got up and ran to the janitor\'s storage booth Kicked the door hinge loose and ripped out the four inch screws Grabbed some sharp objects, brooms, and foreign tools "This is for every time you took my orange juice Or stole my seat in the lunchroom and drank my chocolate milk Every time you tipped my tray and it dropped and spilt I\'m gettin\' you back bully, now once and for good" I cocked the broomstick back and swung hard as I could And beat him over the head with it till I broke the wood Knocked him down, stood on his chest with one foot Made it home, later that same day Started reading a comic and suddenly everything became gray I couldn\'t even see what I was tryna to read I went deaf and my left ear started to bleed My mother started screamin\', "What are you on, drugs? Look at you, you\'re gettin blood all over my rug" (Sorry) She beat me over the head with the remote control Opened a hole, and my whole brain fell out of my skull I picked it up and screamed, "Look bitch, what have you done?" (Oh my God, I\'m sorry son) Shut up you cunt I said, "Fuck it," took it and stuck it back up in my head Then I sewed it shut and put a couple of screws in my neck  Brain damage, ever since the day I was born Drugs is what they used to say I was on They say I never knew which way I was goin\' But everywhere I go they keep playin\' my song  Brain damage, ever since the day I was born Drugs is what they used to say I was on They say I never knew which way I was goin\' But everywhere I go they keep playin\' my song Brain damage  It\'s brain damage I got brain damage It\'s brain damage It\'s probably brain damage It\'s brain damage Brain damage I got brain damage It\'s brain damage  \n ', " Em, What's goin' on, this is Paul Rosenberg, your faithful attorney at law. Listen, I listened to the rough copy of your album and uhh, you know I just gotta be honest with you. Could you tone it down a little bit, because there's only so much I can explain. Gimme a call.  \n ", '  Spoken : Life; by Marshall Mathers. What is life? Life is like a big obstacle in front of your optical to slow you down, and every time you think you gotten past it, it\'s gonna come back around and tackle you to the damn ground. What are friends? Friends are people that you think are your friends, but they really your enemies with secret identities and disguises to hide they true colors. So just when you think you close enough to be brothers, they wanna come back and cut your throat when you ain\'t lookin\'. What is money? Money is what makes a man act funny. Money is the root of all evil. Money\'ll make them same friends come back around, swearing that they was always down! What is life? I\'m tired of life!  I\'m tired of backstabbing ass snakes with friendly grins I\'m tired of committing so many sins Tired of always giving in when this bottle of Henny wins Tired of never having any ends Tired of having skinny friends hooked on crack and mini-thins I\'m tired of this DJ playing your shit when he spins Tired of not having a deal Tired of having to deal with the bullshit without grabbing the steel Tired of drowning in my sorrow Tired of having to borrow a dollar for gas to start my Monte Carlo I\'m tired of motherfuckers spraying shit and dartin\' off I\'m tired of jobs startin\' off at five fifty an hour Then this boss wonders why I\'m smartin\' off I\'m tired of being fired every time I fart and cough Tired of having to work as a gas station clerk For this jerk breathing down my neck, driving me berserk I\'m tired of using plastic silverware Tired of working in Building Square, tired of not being a millionaire  But if I had a million dollars I\'d buy a damn brewery and turn the planet into alcoholics If I had a magic wand I\'d make the world suck my dick without a condom on while I\'m on the john If I had a million bucks It wouldn\'t be enough, \'cause I\'d still be out robbing armored trucks If I had one wish I would ask for a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss  I\'m tired of being white trash: broke and always poor Tired of taking pop bottles back to the party store Tired of not having a phone Tired of not having a home to have one in if I did have one on Tired of not driving a BM Tired of not working at GM, tired of wanting to be him Tired of not sleeping without a Tylenol PM Tired of not performing in a packed coliseum Tired of not being on tour Tired of fucking the same blonde whore after work in the back of a Contour I\'m tired of faking knots with a stack of ones Having a lack of funds and resorting back to guns Tired of being stared at Tired of wearing the same damn Nike Air hat Tired of stepping in clubs wearing the same pair of Lugz Tired of people saying they\'re tired of hearing me rap about drugs Tired of other rappers who ain\'t bringin\' half the skill as me Saying they wasn\'t feeling me on "Nobody\'s As Ill As Me" I\'m tired of radio stations telling fibs Tired of JLB saying "Where Hip-Hop Lives"  But if I had a million dollars I\'d buy a damn brewery and turn the planet into alcoholics If I had a magic wand I\'d make the world suck my dick without a condom on while I\'m on the john If I had a million bucks It wouldn\'t be enough, \'cause I\'d still be out robbing armored trucks If I had one wish I would ask for a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss   Spoken : You know what I\'m saying? I\'m tired of all of this bullshit! Telling me to be positive? How\'m I \'posed to be positive when I don\'t see shit positive?! You know what I\'m sayin\'? I rap about shit around me, shit I see, know what I\'m sayin\'? Right now I\'m tired of everything! Tired of all this playa hating that\'s going on in my own city, can\'t get no airplay, you know what I\'m sayin\'? But hey, it\'s cool though, you know what I\'m sayin\'? Just fed up! That\'s my word!  \n ', " Just the two of us (Baby your dada loves you) (Hey) Just the two of us Just the two of us (And I'mma always be here for you) (Hey) Just the two of us (No matter what happens)  Just the two of us (You're all I got in this world)  Just the two of us (I would never give you up for nothin' Just the two of us (Nobody in this world) Just the two of us (Is ever gonna keep you from me, I love you)  C'mon Hai-Hai, we goin' to the beach Grab a couple of toys and let dada strap you in the car seat Oh where's mama? She's takin' a little nap in the trunk Oh that smell (Whew), dada must've runned over a skunk Now I know what you're thinkin', it's kind of late to go swimmin' But you know your mama, she's one of those type of women That do crazy things, and if she don't get her way, she'll throw a fit Don't play with dada's toy knife, honey, let go of it (No) And don't look so upset, why you actin' bashful? Don't you want to help dada build a sand castle? (Yeah) And mama said she wants to show you how far she can float And don't worry about that little boo-boo on her throat It's just a little scratch, it don't hurt Her was eatin dinner while you were sweepin' and spilled ketchup on her shirt Mama's messy isn't she? We'll let her wash off in the water And me and you can play by ourselves, can't we?  Just the two of us, just the two of us (And when we ride) Just the two of us, just the two of us (Just you and I) Just the two of us, just the two of us (And when we ride) Just the two of us, just the two of us (Just you and I)  See honey, there's a place called Heaven and a place called Hell A place called prison and a place called jail And dada's probably on his way to all of them except one 'Cause mama's got a new husband and a stepson And you don't want a brother do ya? (Nah) Maybe when you're old enough to understand a little better I'll explain it to ya But for now we'll just say mama was real, real bad She was bein' mean to dad and made him real, real mad But I still feel sad that I put her on time-out Sit back in your chair honey, quit tryin to climb out (Wah) I told you it's okay Hai Hai, wanna ba-ba? Take a night-night? Nana-boo, goo-goo ga-ga? Her make poo-poo ca-ca? Dada change your dia-dee Clean the baby up so her can take a nighty-nighty Your dad'll wake her up as soon as we get to the water '97 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my daughter  Just the two of us, just the two of us (And when we ride) Just the two of us, just the two of us (Just you and I) Just the two of us, just the two of us (And when we ride) Just the two of us, just the two of us (Just you and I)  Wake up, sweepy head, we're here Before we pway, we're gonna take mama for a wittle walk along the pier Baby, don't cry, honey, don't get the wrong idea Mama's too sweepy to hear you screaming in her ear (Mama?) That's why you can't get her to wake But don't worry, dada made a nice bed for mommy at the bottom of the lake Here, you wanna help dada tie a rope around this rock? (Yeah) We'll tie it to her footsie then we'll roll her off the dock Ready now, here we go, on the count of free One, two, free, whee There goes mama, spwashin' in the water No more fighting with dad, no more restraining order No more step-dada, no more new brother Blow her kisses bye-bye, tell mama you wuv her (Mommy?) Now we'll go play in the sand, build a castle and junk But first, just help dad with two more things out the trunk  Just the two of us, just the two of us (And when we ride) Just the two of us, just the two of us (Just you and I) Just the two of us, just the two of us (And when we ride) Just the two of us, just the two of us (Just you and I)  Just the two of us (Just me and you baby) Just the two of us (Is all we need in this world) Just the two of us (Just me and you) Just the two of us  Your dada will always be there for you Your dada's always gonna love you, remember that If you ever need me I'mma always be here for you If you ever need anything, just ask Dada will be right there Your dada loves you I love you baby  \n ", ' *Girl talking on phone* Justin, its Zoe, Um Kellie did not have me call you However I just listened to Eminem in her car It is the most disgusting thing I have ever heard In my entire life and I seriously want to call his Fucking agent and tell them how fucking disgusting he is It like makes me upset, I am now nauseous and I cant eat lunch Goodbye  \n ', '  Spoken : Ok, I\'m going to attempt to drown myself. You can try this at home. You can be just like me. Mic check 1 2, we recordin\'?  I\'m cancerous, so when I diss you wouldn\'t wanna answer this If you responded back with a battle rap you wrote for  Canibus  I\'ll strangle you to death, then I\'ll choke you again And break your fuckin\' legs till your bones poke through your skin (Ahh) You\'ve beef with me, I\'ma even the score equally: Take you on  Jerry Springer  and beat your ass legally! I get too blunted off of funny home grown \'Cause when I smoke out I hit the trees harder than  Sonny Bono  (Oh no!) So if I said I never did drugs, That would mean I lie  and  get fucked more that the president does!  Hillary Clinton  tried to slap me and call me a pervert I ripped her fucking tonsils out and fed her sherbet! (bitch!) My nerves hurt, and lately I\'m on edge Grabbed  Vanilla Ice  and ripped out his blonde dreads (C\'mere, motherfucker!) Every girl I ever went out with is goin\' les\' Follow me and do exactly what the song says: Smoke weed, take pills, drop outta school, kill people and drink Jump behind the wheel like it was still legal I\'m dumb enough to walk in a store and steal So I\'m dumb enough to ask a for date with  Lauryn Hill  Some people only see that I\'m white, ignoring skill \'Cause I stand out like a green hat with an orange bill But I don\'t get pissed, y\'all don\'t even see through the mist How the fuck can I be white? I don\'t even exist! I get a clean shave, bathe, go to a rave, Die from an overdose and dig myself up out of my grave My middle finger won\'t go down, how do I wave? And this is how I\'m supposed to teach kids how to behave?  Now follow me and do exactly what you see Don\'t you wanna grow up to be just like me? I slap women and eat shrooms, then O.D. Now don\'t you wanna grow up to be just like me?  Me and  Marcus Allen  went over to see  Nicole  When we heard a knock on the door (knock), must\'ve been  Ron Gold  Jumped behind the door, put the orgy on hold Killed \'em both then smeared blood on the white Bronco (We did it!) My mind won\'t work If my spine don\'t jerk I slapped  Garth Brooks  out of his rhinestone shirt I\'m not a player just an ill rhyme-sayer That\'ll spray an aerosol can up at the ozone layer (*psssssssh*) My rap style\'s warped I\'m runnin\' out the morgue With your dead grandmother\'s corpse to throw it on your porch (*scream*) Jumped in a Chickenhawk cartoon with a cape on And beat up  Foghorn Leghorn  With an acorn I\'m about as normal as  Norman Bates  with deformative traits A premature birth that was four minutes late "Mother, are you there? I love you! I never meant to hit you over the head with that shovel!" (*evil laugh*) Will someone please explain To my brain That I just severed a main vein With a chainsaw and I\'m in pain? I take a breather and sigh, either I\'m high Or I\'m nuts, \'cause if you ain\'t tiltin\' this room, neither am I So when you see your mom with a thermometer Shoved in her ass, then it probably is obvious I got it on with her \'Cause when I drop this solo shit it\'s over with I bought  Cage\'s  tape, opened it and dubbed over it  I came to the club drunk and with a fake ID Don\'t you wanna grow up to be just like me? I\'ve been with 10 women who got  HIV  Now don\'t you wanna grow up to be just like me? I got  genital warts  and it burns when I pee Don\'t you wanna grow up to be just like me? I tie a rope around my penis and jump from a tree You probably wanna grow up the just like me!  \n ', "  (For all the ladies out there)  I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl I never meant to bring you to my world And now you're lying in the corner crying  \n ", ' I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault  (Eminem) I went to John\'s rave with Ron and Dave And met a new wave blonde babe with half of her head shaved (whistle) A nurse aid who came to get laid and tied up With first aid tape and raped on the first date Susan -- an ex-heroin addict who just stopped usin\' Who love booze and alternative music (Whattup?) Told me she was goin\' back into usin\' again (Nah!) I said, "Wait, first try this hallucinogen It\'s better than heroin, Henn, the booze or the gin C\'mere, let\'s go in here" *knocks on the door* "Who\'s in the den?" (R) "It\'s me and Kelly!" "My bad, (sorry) let\'s try another room" (S) "I don\'t trust you!" "Shut up slut! Chew up this mushroom This\'ll help you get in touch with your roots We\'ll get barefoot, buttnaked, and run in the woods (S) "Oh hell, I might as well try em, this party\'s so drag" "Oh, dag! I didn\'t mean for you to eat the whole bag!" (Huh?!)  I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault (I\'m sorry!) I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault  Yo Sue (S) "Get away from me! I don\'t know you" Oh shoot, she\'s tripping (S) "I need to go puke" I wasn\'t trying to turn this into something major I just wanted to make you appreciate nature Susan, stop crying I don\'t hate ya The world\'s not against you, I\'m sorry your father raped ya So what you had your little coochie in your dad\'s mouth That ain\'t no reason to start wiggin\' and spaz out She said (S) "Help me, Slim, I think I\'m having a seizure!" I said "I\'m high too bitch, quit grabbing my t-shirt! (let go) Will you calm down, Sue? You\'re starting to scare me." She said (S) "I\'m 26 years old and I\'m not married! I don\'t even have any kids and I can\'t cook!" I\'m over here Sue, you\'re talking to the plant look We need to get to a hospital before it\'s too late \'Cause I never seen no one eat as many shrooms as you ate  I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault (It was an accident!) I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault  Susan (wait) where you going, you better be careful (S) "Leave me alone dad, I\'m sick of getting my hair pulled!" I\'m not your dad, quit trying to swallow your tongue Want some gum? Put down the scissors before you do something dumb I\'ll be right back, just chill baby please I gotta go find Dave, he\'s the one who gave me these John where\'s Dave at before I bash you (J) "He\'s in the bathroom, I think he\'s taking a crap dude!" Dave pull up your pants, we need an ambulance There\'s a girl upstairs talking to plants, chopping her hair off And there\'s only two days left of spring break, How long does it take for these things to wear off? (D) "Well it depends on how many you had" I took 3, she eat the other 22 caps Now she\'s upstairs crying out her eyeballs, drinking Lysol (D) "She\'s gonna die, dude!" I know and it\'s my fault (My God!)  I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world (I\'m sorry!) But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault (What did I do?) I never meant to give you mushrooms girl I never meant to bring you to my world But now you\'re sitting in the corner crying And now it\'s my fault, my fault  My god, I\'m so sorry! I\'m so SORRY! Susan, please wake up! Please! Please WAKE UP! What are you doing? You\'re not dead! You\'re not dead! I know you\'re not dead... Wake up... Susan, wake up... Oh, my God...  \n ', " Ken: Let's call this motherfucker. (dials operator) Ken: Oh, fuck yeah... give him a piece of my mind... piece of my ass. (operator comes on) Operator: Thanks for waiting. Hello, may I help you? Ken: Oh, thank you. I need to make a collect call. Operator: What number? Ken: Oh... the number's (censored) Operator: At the tone, please say your name. (Beep) Ken: Kenneth Kaniff, from Connecticut. (connecting) Automated piece of shit. Eminem: Yo? Ken: Hey there, cock boy. Eminem: Who's this? Ken: This is Ken Kaniff. Eminem: Who? Ken: Ken Kaniff from Connecticut, you lil' bitch. Eminem: From Connecticut? Ken: Yeah, you wanna... Eminem: I don't know nobody in Connecticut. Ken: You wanna get a hotel room with me? Eminem: A hotel room? Ken: Yeah, you want me to lick your ass, EMINEM? Eminem: (laughs) Yo, who is this? Cage? Ken: (laughing) You want me to fuckin' melt in your mouth and not in your hand? Melt in your ass, ya lil' cock boy. Eminem: (snickers) Yo, shut up, you lil' bitch. Ken: Oh, you think I'm lying, huh? Eminem: (laughing out loud) Ken: Ugh.  \n ", ' Yo, mic check (Haha, whoo, shit) Testing one, two, um, twelve What up? What up? What up? (Outsidaz) This is my dance song, can you hear me? (Rah Digga, Pacewon, Young Zee) Alright, ay turn my headphones up  My favorite color is red, like the blood shed From Kurt Cobain\'s head when he shot himself dead Women all grabbin\' at my shish-kabob Bought Lauryn Hill\'s tape so her kids could starve (I can